Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-904
Technology-related product or service; scrutinized company; contract prohibited.

A scrutinized company shall not bid on, submit a proposal for, or enter into, directly or indirectly through a third party, any contract or contract renewal with any public entity for any technology-related product or service.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 10.